Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.120

Limitation on action—Exception.

An action to enforce a liability created under this chapter is permanently barred unless commenced within two years after the cause of action accrues, except that where a defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented information required under this chapter to be disclosed to an individual and the information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the defendant's liability to that individual under this chapter, the action may be brought at any time within two years after discovery by the individual of the misrepresentation.

[ 1993 c 476 s 14.]